Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.210

Custody orders—Background information to be consulted.

(1) Before granting any order under this chapter, the court must consult the judicial information system, if available, to determine the existence of any information and proceedings that are relevant to the placement of the child.

(2) Before entering a final order, the court must:

(a) Direct the department of children, youth, and families to release information regarding all proposed guardians and all adult members of any proposed guardian's household as provided under RCW 13.50.100; and

(b) Require the petitioner to provide the results of an examination of state and national criminal identification data provided by the Washington state patrol criminal identification system as described in chapter 43.43 RCW for all proposed guardians as well as all adult members of the proposed guardian's household.

[ 2022 c 243 s 7; 2020 c 312 s 105; 2019 c 437 s 206.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.